Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 8 Miscellaneous Offenses

46-9-250.
Demand or receipt by railroad companies of more than a fair and reasonable rate for transportation of passengers or freight or for transportation of railroad cars.

If any railroad company organized or doing business under the laws of this state charges, collects, demands, or receives more than a fair and reasonable rate of toll or compensation for the transportation of passengers or freight of any description, or for the use and transportation of any railroad car upon its track or any of the branches thereof, or upon any railroad within this state which it has the right, license, or permission to use, operate, or control, that company shall be deemed guilty of extortion, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be subject to the liabilities and penalties provided in Code Sections 46-2-90, 46-2-92, and 46-2-93.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 3; Code 1882, § 719c; Civil Code 1895, § 2187; Civil Code 1910, § 2628; Code 1933, § 93-406; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

Cross references.

Authority of General Assembly regarding regulation of public utility rates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

Prohibition against rebates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

46-9-251.
Unjust discrimination by railroad companies as to rates or charges for transportation of passengers or freight and for use and transportation of railroad cars.

If any railroad company organized or doing business under the laws of this state makes any unjust discrimination in its rates or charges of toll or any compensation for the transportation of passengers or freight of any description, or for the use and transportation of any railroad car upon its road or upon any of the branches thereof, or upon any railroad connected therewith which it has the right, license, or permission to operate, control, or use within this state, that corporation shall be deemed guilty of having violated the provisions of this title, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be subject to the liabilities and penalties provided in Code Sections 46-2-90, 46-2-92, and 46-2-93.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 4; Code 1882, § 719d; Civil Code 1895, § 2188; Civil Code 1910, § 2629; Code 1933, § 93-407.

Cross references.

Authority of General Assembly regarding regulation of public utility rates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

Prohibition against rebates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

46-9-252.
Overcharging by officers, agents, or other employees of common carriers.

Any officer, agent, or other employee of a common carrier who charges a rate for transporting freight or passengers which is in excess of the rates established by the commission shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 237, § 1; Code 1868, § 4513; Code 1873, § 4603; Code 1882, § 4603; Penal Code 1895, § 681; Penal Code 1910, § 730; Code 1933, § 18-9913.

Cross references.

Authority of General Assembly regarding regulation of public utility rates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

Prohibition against rebates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. VI.

General prohibition against unjust discrimination in freight-transportation rates by common carriers, §

46-9-52

.

46-9-253.
Transportation of gunpowder, dynamite, or other explosives.

Any person who causes more than five pounds of gunpowder, or any amount of dynamite or other dangerous explosive, to be transported upon water, by railroad, or otherwise shall have the word “Gunpowder,” “Dynamite,” or other name of the explosive marked in large letters upon each package so transported. Gunpowder, dynamite, or other dangerous explosive transported in violation of this Code section are declared contraband and shall be forfeited in accordance with the procedures set forth in Chapter 16 of Title 9.

History.

Laws 1831; Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 850; Code 1863, §§ 1412, 1413; Code 1868, §§ 1469, 1470; Code 1873, §§ 1463, 1464; Code 1882, §§ 1463, 1464; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2291, 2292; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2745, 2746; Code 1933, § 18-317; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-27/HB 233.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “in violation of this Code section are declared contraband and shall be forfeited in accordance with the procedures set forth in Chapter 16 of Title 9” for “in violation of said provision shall be liable to seizure and forfeiture by any officer who may execute a criminal warrant, under warrant for that purpose, issued by any officer who may issue such first-named warrants, one-half of the same to go to the informer, the other half to go to the military fund of the state, after public sale by order of the officer issuing the warrant, or one of like authority”. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Cross references.

Penalty for carrying explosives aboard public transit bus or rapid rail car, §

16-12-120

.

Transportation of motor fuel, §

48-9-9

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date.
Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).